Tennessee, session 114, SB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-404(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)" and substituting "one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-404(b), is amended by deleting
"one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)" and substituting "two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1383
002437
- 1 -